Washington statutes.
RCW 15.54.940

Continuation of rules adopted pursuant to repealed sections.

The repeal of sections 15.54.010 through 15.54.250 and 15.54.900, chapter 11, Laws of 1961 and chapter 15.54 RCW and the enactment of this act shall not be deemed to have repealed any rules adopted under the provisions of sections 15.54.010 through 15.54.250 and 15.54.900, chapter 11, Laws of 1961 and chapter 15.54 RCW and in effect immediately prior to such repeal and not inconsistent with the provisions of this act. All such rules shall be considered to have been adopted under the provisions of this act.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 22 s 41.]

NOTES:

Repeal of prior law by 1967 act: "Sections 15.54.010 through 15.54.250 and section 15.54.900, chapter 11, Laws of 1961 and RCW 15.54.010 through 15.54.250 and 15.54.900 are each repealed." [ 1967 ex.s. c 22 s 43.]